Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW to read as follows:(1) It is an unfair practice for any employer to include a statement in a job advertisement, posting, application, or other material that an applicant must have a valid driver's license, unless the position description in the advertisement, posting, application, or other material includes job functions that require the operation of a motor vehicle in a manner that would require a driver's license.(2) For purposes of this section, transportation to and from the job site does not constitute a job function requiring the operation of a motor vehicle.(3) A person injured by a violation of this section may bring a civil cause of action against the employer to enjoin further violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together with the cost of the suit and reasonable attorneys' fees.--- END ---